apertium-es-gl.gl.dix
<pardef n="acheg/ar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ariamos</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ariámo</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ariámos</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ariámo</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aría</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aría</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__habería"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ariades</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ariáde</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ariádes</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arías</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aría</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arías</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arían</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arían</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aría</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aría</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aremos</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arémo</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arémos</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arémo</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arei</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arei</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aréi</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aredes</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aréde</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arédes</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arás</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aras</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arás</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arán</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aran</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arán</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ará</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ará</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>armos</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ármo</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ármos</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ármo</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ár</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ardes</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>árde</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>árdes</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ares</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>áre</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>áres</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aren</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>áren</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ár</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ando</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándo</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándomos</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándomo</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándomos</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándomo</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándodes</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándode</l>    <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ándodes</l>   <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amos</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ámo</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ámos</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos2"/></e>

<e lm="abrigar"><i>abrig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abrogar"><i>abrog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acabalgar"><i>acabalg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="achegar"><i>acheg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="achegar como proba"><i>acheg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>como<b/>proba</l><r><g><b/>como<b/>proba</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="aconchegar"><i>aconcheg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acougar"><i>acoug</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afogar"><i>afog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="agregar"><i>agreg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alagar"><i>alag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alargar"><i>alarg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="albergar"><i>alberg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alegar"><i>aleg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alugar"><i>alug</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amargar"><i>amarg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apagar"><i>apag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apegar"><i>apeg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arraigar"><i>arraig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atafegar"><i>atafeg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ateigar"><i>ateig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="augar"><i>aug</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avogar"><i>avog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cabalgar"><i>cabalg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cargar"><i>carg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="castigar"><i>castig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="catalogar"><i>catalog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cegar"><i>ceg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chegar"><i>cheg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="colgar"><i>colg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comulgar"><i>comulg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="congregar"><i>congreg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="delegar"><i>deleg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="denegar"><i>deneg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="derrogar"><i>derrog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="descabalgar"><i>descabalg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="descolgar"><i>descolg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="despegar"><i>despeg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dialogar"><i>dialog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="divulgar"><i>divulg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dobregar"><i>dobreg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encargar"><i>encarg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entregar"><i>entreg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="escorregar"><i>escorreg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estragar"><i>estrag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="folgar"><i>folg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="furgar"><i>furg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indagar"><i>indag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="investigar"><i>investig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="legar"><i>leg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lumbrigar"><i>lumbrig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="naufragar"><i>naufrag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="negar"><i>neg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="obrigar"><i>obrig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pagar"><i>pag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="postergar"><i>posterg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pregar"><i>preg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prodigar"><i>prodig</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prolongar"><i>prolong</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="propagar"><i>propag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recargar"><i>recarg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="regar"><i>reg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="renegar"><i>reneg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rogar"><i>rog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="subxugar"><i>subxug</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tragar"><i>trag</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="xogar"><i>xog</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zorregar"><i>zorreg</i><par n="acheg/ar__vblex"/></e>
